Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-942
Division of Administrative Services; assistant director; qualifications.

The Director of Correctional Services shall appoint as assistant director of the Division of Administrative Services any person who shall have a thorough academic background and practical experience in correctional administrative work.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 20.